District of Columbia statutes.
6-1311

Enforcement.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to make available any benefits to a foreign mission contrary to this chapter. The United States, acting on its own behalf or on behalf of a foreign mission, has standing to bring or intervene in an action to obtain compliance with this chapter, including any action for injunctive or other equitable relief.

(b)

Upon the request of any federal agency, any state or local government agency, or any business or other person that proposes to enter into a contract or other transaction with a foreign mission, the Secretary shall advise whether the proposed transaction is prohibited by any regulation or determination of the Secretary under this chapter.

Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 97-241, § 211
1981 Ed., § 5-1211.
For effective date of amendment made by title II of Pub. L. 97-241, Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-1301.